Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 5. GOVERNMENTAL LIABILITY

CHAPTER 112. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY FOR GOVERNMENTAL UNITS

Sec. 112.001. CERTAIN ACTIONS OF FIRST RESPONDERS AND VOLUNTEER EMERGENCY SERVICES PERSONNEL. (a) In this section:

(1) "First responder" and "volunteer emergency services personnel" have the meanings assigned by Section 46.01, Penal Code.

(2) "Governmental unit" has the meaning assigned by Section 101.001.

(b) A governmental unit is not liable in a civil action arising from the discharge of a handgun by an individual who is a first responder or volunteer emergency services personnel and licensed to carry the handgun under Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code.

(c) The discharge of a handgun by an individual who is a first responder or volunteer emergency services personnel and licensed to carry the handgun under Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code, is outside the course and scope of the individual's duties as a first responder or volunteer emergency services personnel, as applicable.

(d) This section may not be construed to waive the immunity from suit or liability of a governmental unit under Chapter 101 or any other law.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (H.B. 435), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1026 (H.B. 1069), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1026 (H.B. 1069), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.